District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.37

Repealed

Voting of shares — Executive committee; powers.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 194, ch. 269, § 37
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.37.
1981 Ed., § 29-337.
1973 Ed., § 29-916e.